Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2.2. Evaluation of Director of Office of Emergency Medical Services.

§ 32.1-111.16.
Director of Office of Emergency Medical Services annual performance evaluation.

Effective on and after July 1, 1996, the Commissioner of Health, in consultation with the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, shall annually review and evaluate the performance of the Director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services. The Commissioner shall consider the Director’s effectiveness in operating and managing the programs, services, and personnel, of the Office of Emergency Medical Services and the statewide emergency medical care system established in Article 2.1 (§

32.1-111.1

et seq.) of this chapter; any recommendations of the Advisory Board; and such other relevant information as may be made available to the Commissioner pertaining to the Director’s performance of his duties.

History.

1996, c. 192.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 192, cl. 1, enacted a new section, § 32.1-112.2, which falls within the span of sections repealed by Acts 1996, c. 899. At the direction of the Code Commission, this enactment has been recodified as §

32.1-111.16

, and added as a new Article 2.2 of Chapter 4 of this title, following the span of sections enacted by Acts 1996, c. 899.